Hawaii statutes.
§386-2 Definitions relating to family
relationships. "Brother" or "sister" includes a half
brother or half sister, a stepbrother or stepsister, and a brother or sister by
adoption.

"Child" includes a posthumous child,
adopted child, stepchild, child born to parents not married to each other, and
hanai child acknowledged prior to the personal injury.

"Grandchild" includes a child of an
adopted child and a child of a stepchild, but does not include a stepchild of a
child.

"Grandparent" includes a parent of a
parent by adoption, but does not include a parent of a stepparent, a stepparent
of a parent, or a stepparent of a stepparent.

"Parent" includes a stepparent or a
parent by adoption. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-2; HRS §386-2; am L
1982, c 193, §1; am L 1997, c 52, §1]

Revision Note

Definitions rearranged pursuant to §23G-15.

Attorney General Opinions

Prior to 1982 amendment, benefits under workers' compensation
law did not extend to hanai children. Att. Gen. Op. 93-1.

Case Notes

Construed. 31 H. 814 (1931).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next